Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2906
Financial exploitation; qualified person; notify agencies.

If a qualified person reasonably believes that financial exploitation of an eligible adult may have occurred, may have been attempted, or is occurring or being attempted, the qualified person may notify the agencies.

Laws 2021, LB297, § 3.